sk-SK: Typ pohonu plavidla na diaľkové ovládanie: Dúchadlo; Prúdový pohon (vodomet); Kolesový pohon; Lodná skrutka; Dvojitá lodná skrutka; Iné
en: Remote control watercraft propulsion/drive type: Ducted propeller; Jet drive (waterjet); Paddle wheel; Propeller drive; Twin propeller; Other
sl-SI: Vrsta pogona daljinsko vodenega plovila: Oklopljen propeler; Reaktivni pogon (vodni curek); Kolo z lopaticami; Pogon na propeler; Dvojni propeler; Drugo
ko: 원격 조종 수상 차량 추진/구동 유형: 덕트형 프로펠러; 제트 드라이브(워터제트); 패들 휠; 프로펠러 드라이브; 트윈 프로펠러; 기타
ja: 遠隔操作水上艇の推進／駆動方式: ダクテッドプロペラ; ジェットドライブ（ウォータージェット）; パドルホイール; プロペラドライブ; ツインプロペラ; その他
pl: Napęd/typ napędu jednostki pływającej zdalnie sterowanej: Pędnik tunelowy; Napęd strugowodny (waterjet); Koło łopatkowe; Napęd śrubowy; Podwójna śruba; Inne
zh-TW: 遙控船艇推進/驅動類型: 涵道螺旋槳; 噴射驅動 (水流噴射); 槳輪; 螺旋槳驅動; 雙螺旋槳; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de propulsão/acionamento da embarcação de controlo remoto: Hélice intubada; Propulsão a jato (jato de água); Roda de pás; Propulsão a hélice; Hélice dupla; Outro
zh-CN: 遥控船艇推进/驱动类型: 涵道螺旋桨; 喷水推进器（水流喷射）; 明轮; 螺旋桨驱动; 双螺旋桨; 其他
cs: Typ pohonu/pohonu plavidla na dálkové ovládání: Oplášťovaná vrtule (dmychadlo); Vodní tryskový pohon (waterjet); Kolesový pohon; Vrtulový pohon; Dvojitá vrtule; Jiné
th: ประเภทการขับเคลื่อน/ระบบส่งกำลังของเรือบังคับวิทยุ: ใบพัดแบบมีท่อหุ้ม; ขับเคลื่อนด้วยเจ็ท (วอเตอร์เจ็ท); ล้อใบพาย; ขับเคลื่อนด้วยใบพัด; ใบพัดคู่; อื่นๆ
vi: Loại động cơ/hệ thống đẩy cho tàu thuyền điều khiển từ xa: Chân vịt có ống đạo lưu; Dẫn động phản lực (tia nước); Guồng nước; Dẫn động bằng chân vịt; Chân vịt kép; Khác
ru: Тип привода радиоуправляемого водного транспорта: Импеллер; Водометный движитель; Гребное колесо; Гребной винт; Двойной гребной винт; Другое
bg-BG: Тип задвижване/пропулсия на радиоуправляем плавателен съд: Импелер (канален винт); Реактивно задвижване (водомет); Гребно колело; Задвижване с витло; Двойно витло; Други
fr: Type de propulsion du bateau radiocommandé: Hélice carénée; Propulsion à jet (jet d’eau); Roue à aubes; Propulsion par hélice; Double hélice; Autre
tr: Uzaktan kumandalı deniz aracı tahrik/sürüş tipi: Kanallı pervane; Jet tahrik (su jeti); Çark; Pervane tahrikli; Çift pervane; Diğer
pt-BR: Controle remoto embarcação propulsão/acionamento tipo: Hélice em dutos; Propulsão a jato (jato de água); Roda de pás; Propulsão a hélice; Hélice dupla; Outro
it: Tipo di propulsione/guida per imbarcazioni telecomandato: Elica intubata; Propulsione a getto (idrogetto); Ruota a pale; Propulsione a elica; Doppia elica; Altro
de: Antriebsart für ferngesteuerte Wasserfahrzeuge: Ummantelter Propeller; Jet-Antrieb (Wasserstrahl); Schaufelrad; Propellerantrieb; Zweifach-Propeller; Sonstiges
es: Tipo de propulsión o accionamiento del barco a control remoto: Hélice entubada; Propulsión a chorro (chorro de agua); Rueda de paletas; Propulsión por hélice; Hélice doble; Otro
sv: Fjärrstyrd vattenfarkost framdrivning/drivtyp: Inkapslad propeller; Vattenjet; Skovelhjul; Propellerdrift; Dubbelpropeller; Annat
lt-LT: Nuotoliniu būdu valdomo vandens transporto pavaros tipas: Kanalinis sraigtas; Reaktyvinė pavara (vandens čiurkšlė); Mentinis ratas; Sraigtinė pavara; Dvigubas sraigtas; Kitas
el: Τύπος πρόωσης/κίνησης σκαφών τηλεχειρισμού: Προπέλα σε αγωγό; Jet drive (waterjet); Τροχός με πτερύγια; Προώθηση με προπέλα; Διπλή προπέλα; Άλλο
nb: Type propulsjon/fremdrift for fjernstyrt farkost: Propell med dyse; Vannjet; Skovlhjul; Propelldrift; Dobbel propell; Annet
fi: Kauko-ohjattavan vesialuksen propulsion/käyttölaitteen tyyppi: Kanavoitu potkuri; Vesisuihkuveto (jet); Siipiratas; Potkuriveto; Kaksoispotkuri; Muu
ro-RO: Tip de propulsie/acționare cu telecomandă pentru ambarcațiuni nautice: Elice încastrată; Sistem cu jet (jet de apă); Roată cu zbaturi; Acționare cu elice; Elice dublă; Altele
hr-HR: Vrsta pogona/pogona za plovilo s daljinskim upravljanjem: Oklopljeni propeler; Mlazni pogon (waterjet); Kotač s lopaticama; Propelerni pogon; Dvostruki propeler; Ostalo
nl: RC-vaartuig aandrijvingstype: Straalbuispropeller; Jet-aandrijving (waterjet); Schoepenrad; Propelleraandrijving; Dubbele propeller; Overig
hu: Távirányítós vízi jármű meghajtásának, illetve hajtásrendszerének típusa: Légcsatornás propeller; Jet-hajtás (vízsugaras); Lapátkerék; Propelleres hajtás; Ikerpropeller; Egyéb
da: Fjernbetjent vandfartøjs fremdrifts-/drevtype: Dysepropel; Jetdrev (vandjet); Skovlhjul; Propeldrev; Dobbelt propel; Andet